Mathematical and Architectural Foundations for Hand Finger Movement Analysis: A Unified Framework Integrating Geometric Mechanics with Spatial Design Principles

Author: Ouadi Maakoul
Date: 20

---

Abstract

The human hand represents one of the most sophisticated biomechanical systems, yet current approaches to understanding and replicating its movements remain fragmented between mathematical modeling and physical design. This dissertation develops a unified theoretical framework that integrates advanced mathematical modeling with architectural and design principles to analyze, represent, and generate hand finger movements. By synthesizing geometric mechanics—including screw theory, Lie groups, and port-Hamiltonian systems—with spatial design thinking drawn from architecture, the work establishes a novel interdisciplinary language for describing hand kinematics and dynamics. The framework introduces formal spatial grammars for hand movements, pattern languages for grasping, and tectonic principles for mechanical expression, while maintaining rigorous mathematical foundations. Building upon prior work in port-Hamiltonian finger modeling and screw-theoretic hand analysis, this dissertation provides the first unified integration of geometric mechanics with human-centered spatial design principles. The coupling–adaptation paradox is characterized geometrically through a novel adaptation index, and formal mappings between mathematical and design representations enable dual representation and integrated design space exploration. A theoretical design exploration illustrates Pareto-optimal trade-offs between functional adaptation and mechanical legibility. This integration bridges the gap between mathematical abstraction and human‑centered design, offering a theoretical basis for applications in prosthetics, rehabilitation, and human‑robot interaction.

Keywords: Hand kinematics, geometric mechanics, screw theory, Lie groups, port-Hamiltonian systems, architectural design, spatial grammars, pattern languages, tectonics, underactuation, coupling–adaptation paradox, mechanical legibility, computational design.

---

Chapter 1: Introduction

1.1 The Hand as a Bridge Between Mathematics and Design

The human hand is a marvel of biological engineering: it combines strength and precision, adaptability and control, in a compact form that has inspired generations of scientists, engineers, and designers. Its kinematic complexity—with up to 27 degrees of freedom—allows it to perform an extraordinary range of tasks, from the delicate manipulation of a surgical instrument to the powerful grip of a climbing hold. Understanding and replicating such capabilities requires a deep engagement with both mathematical modeling and physical design.

Mathematics provides the language for describing hand movements with precision: joint angles, velocities, forces, and torques can be encoded in equations that capture the hand's behavior under varying conditions. Classical approaches using Denavit–Hartenberg parameters and Lagrangian dynamics have laid the groundwork, while modern geometric methods—screw theory, Lie groups, port‑Hamiltonian systems—reveal deeper structures and symmetries.

Design, on the other hand, brings human‑centered considerations to the fore. How does a hand feel to its user? How does it communicate its capabilities through its form? How can it adapt to tasks that were not anticipated by its creators? These questions are central to architecture and design, disciplines that have long grappled with creating artifacts that are functional, expressive, and adaptable.

Yet mathematics and design often proceed along separate tracks. Mathematical models, for all their precision, can remain abstract and disconnected from the tangible realities of physical implementation. Design solutions, for all their ingenuity, may lack the rigorous foundation needed for optimization and generalization. This dissertation argues that a true understanding of hand movements—and the creation of artificial hands that approach or exceed human capabilities—requires a synthesis of these two perspectives.

1.2 Problem Statement and Research Questions

The central problem addressed by this dissertation is:

How can we develop a unified theoretical framework that integrates advanced mathematical modeling with architectural and design principles to analyze, represent, and generate hand finger movements?

This overarching problem decomposes into four specific research questions:

· RQ1 (Mathematical Foundation): How can geometric mechanics—specifically screw theory, Lie groups, and port‑Hamiltonian systems—be applied to provide a complete and elegant description of hand kinematics and dynamics, capturing both continuous motion and the discrete changes associated with reconfiguration or underactuation, while building upon and extending existing applications in the field?
· RQ2 (Architectural‑Design Language): What design‑oriented representations—spatial grammars, pattern languages, tectonic principles—can capture the essential features of hand movements in a way that is intuitive for designers and compatible with mathematical formalisms?
· RQ3 (Integration): How can these mathematical and design representations be formally mapped to each other, enabling translation between analytical and synthetic modes of thinking, and what new insights emerge from this dual representation?
· RQ4 (Theoretical Implications and Optimization): How does the integrated framework optimize the trade-off between mechanical efficiency and user intelligibility, and what insights emerge for the design of prosthetic and robotic hands, particularly regarding underactuated mechanisms?

1.3 Thesis Contributions and Originality

This dissertation makes the following original contributions:

1. A Unified Geometric Framework Extending Prior Work: A comprehensive application of screw theory and port‑Hamiltonian systems to hand finger movements that builds upon prior work (Wassink et al. 2010; Dai 2009; Ficuciello et al. 2010) while providing the first integration with spatial design principles. The framework provides a coordinate‑free description that reveals underlying symmetries and simplifies analysis of complex multi‑finger systems, with explicit treatment of underactuation and reconfiguration.
2. Formal Characterization of the Coupling–Adaptation Paradox: A novel geometric characterization of the fundamental trade-off in underactuated finger design, including the introduction of an adaptation index AI(P) = dim(ker(Pᵀ))/rank(P) that quantifies the dimension of the passive subspace. While this index depends only on rank, it is complemented by a condition number κ(P) = σ_max/σ_min that captures the uniformity of coupling. This provides a mathematical basis for optimizing coupling mechanisms and is distinguished from classical manipulability measures.
3. A Spatial Grammar for Hand Movements: A formal rule‑based system for generating and describing hand configurations, defined algebraically with primitives as elements of SE(3), rules as composition operations, and constraints as inequalities on twists. The grammar is shown to be capable of generating a wide range of configurations, including all grasp types in standard taxonomies (e.g., Cutkosky 1989; Feix et al. 2016), and its expressiveness is discussed.
4. An Expanded Pattern Language for Grasping and Manipulation: A hierarchical catalogue of 20 grasp patterns at finger, hand, and task scales, documented with mathematical realizations (joint-angle ranges, force distributions, screw-theoretic grasp qualities) and design guidelines. The patterns are drawn from and extend existing grasp taxonomies, with an explicit note that the set is representative rather than exhaustive. Restraining forces and force closure conditions are included.
5. Tectonic Principles with Quantitative Proxies for Mechanical Legibility: The first systematic application of architectural tectonics to hand design, including quantitative metrics (tendon visibility index TVI, articulation exposure score AES, force flow clarity FFC) that link mechanical expression to user acceptance and cognitive load. These are presented as theoretical proxies requiring empirical validation through future user studies, grounded in concepts from human-robot interaction (Dragan et al. 2013; Hoffman 2013).
6. Formal Mappings and Dual Representation: A rigorous method for translating between joint‑angle descriptions and design patterns, including a nearest-neighbor classification and grammar-based generation. These mappings establish correspondences between the space of design patterns and the submanifolds of the configuration space that realize those patterns, enabling dual representation and integrated design space exploration without claiming categorical structure.
7. Theoretical Pareto Analysis of Design Trade-offs: A theoretical exploration of the design space for underactuated fingers, illustrating Pareto-optimal trade-offs between functional adaptation (AI and CI) and mechanical legibility (TVI). This demonstrates the framework's utility as a conceptual design tool without requiring physical implementation.

1.4 Outline of the Dissertation

Chapter 2 reviews the relevant literature across mathematics, biomechanics, and architecture, with expanded coverage of port-Hamiltonian finger applications, screw-theoretic hand analysis, and recent advances in underactuated mechanisms, identifying specific gaps that motivate the research.

Chapter 3 develops the geometric framework for hand modeling, including kinematic and dynamic formulations, a mathematical treatment of underactuation with the novel adaptation index and complementary condition number, theoretical extensions to handle reconfiguration and variable transmission, and a theorem establishing the coupling–adaptation trade-off.

Chapter 4 introduces the architectural‑design framework: spatial grammars (with algebraic formalization), an expanded pattern language (20 documented patterns), tectonics reframed as mechanical legibility (with quantitative proxies), and adaptability as a design philosophy.

Chapter 5 integrates these two perspectives through formal mappings, introduces a theoretical Pareto optimization framework, and discusses implications for prosthetic and robotic hand design.

Chapter 6 concludes with a summary of contributions, theoretical implications, limitations, and directions for future theoretical research.

---

Chapter 2: Literature Review

2.1 Mathematical Foundations of Kinematic and Dynamic Modeling

2.1.1 Classical Formulations: Denavit–Hartenberg and Lagrangian Mechanics

The mathematical study of robotic manipulators began with classical approaches rooted in vector mechanics. The Denavit–Hartenberg (DH) convention (Denavit & Hartenberg 1955) provides a systematic method for describing serial chain manipulators using four parameters per joint. For a finger with n joints, the forward kinematics are expressed as a product of homogeneous transformation matrices. While widely used, DH parameters have limitations: they become singular for certain joint configurations and obscure the underlying geometric structure.

Lagrangian dynamics provide the natural extension to motion analysis. For a finger with generalized coordinates q, the equations of motion derive from the Lagrangian L = K - V. Applied to finger segments modeled as coupled pendula, this yields equations representing inertia, damping, and stiffness contributions—the so‑called IBK model.

2.1.2 Geometric Approaches: Screw Theory and Lie Groups

The limitations of classical formulations motivated the development of geometric methods rooted in differential geometry and Lie group theory. Murray, Li, and Sastry (1994) established screw theory and the product of exponentials (POE) as fundamental tools. In the POE formulation, the forward kinematics of an n-joint manipulator are expressed as a product of matrix exponentials of screw axes, starting from a home configuration. This formulation offers several advantages: it avoids singularities, handles revolute and prismatic joints uniformly, and reveals the group structure of rigid motions.

Screw-Theoretic Hand Analysis: Dai (2009) applied screw theory to the metamorphic multifingered Metahand, analyzing workspace and orientation capabilities via screw systems and SE(3) geometry. More recent extensions include compliant grippers (Borràs & Dollar 2014), articulation estimation through ScrewNet (2023), and hybrid rigid-continuum mechanisms.

The configuration space of a manipulator is a Lie group—typically SE(3) or one of its subgroups. This geometric perspective enables powerful tools from differential geometry, such as the exponential map and Lie algebra, to be applied to kinematic analysis, and it naturally accommodates the study of symmetries and invariants.

2.1.3 Port‑Hamiltonian Systems for Energy‑Aware Dynamics

Port‑Hamiltonian systems, developed by van der Schaft and Maschke (2002), extend geometric mechanics to incorporate energy exchange with the environment. A port‑Hamiltonian system is defined on a state manifold X with Hamiltonian H: X → ℝ representing total stored energy. The dynamics are structured with a skew‑symmetric interconnection matrix J(x), a dissipation matrix R(x) ≥ 0, and power‑conjugate port variables (u, y).

Port-Hamiltonian Applications to Robotic Fingers: Wassink, Carloni, and Stramigioli (2010) modeled a novel underactuated variable-impedance finger with antagonistic tendons, series-elastic springs, and joint locks using port-Hamiltonian systems on Dirac structures. Their state vector included momenta, joint angles, and spring elongations, with Hamiltonian incorporating kinetic and elastic energy. The interconnection structure included an actuation Jacobian related to screw-based geometric Jacobians for twists and wrenches. Crucially, they explicitly handled underactuation through the kernel of the actuation matrix and demonstrated how compliance tuning affects grasp performance.

Ficuciello et al. (2010) extended this approach to multi-fingered hands with soft finger pads, incorporating contact models and showing how port-Hamiltonian formulations preserve passivity during manipulation. Recent work (Finzi et al. 2023) has added neural port-Hamiltonian ODEs on Lie groups, and rehabilitation applications with electromyographic control integration continue to emerge.

This formulation is ideal for hand modeling because it explicitly represents energy flows, preserves passivity ensuring stable interaction with uncertain environments, allows modular composition of subsystems (fingers, tendons, actuators), and naturally accommodates underactuation and variable transmission.

2.1.4 Tendon‑Driven Mechanism Theory

Tendon‑driven systems are ubiquitous in hand design due to their anthropomorphic inspiration and ability to locate actuators remotely. The mathematical theory addresses several unique aspects:

Tendon Routing and Coupling Matrix: For a finger with n joints and m tendons, the relationship between tendon displacements Δl and joint angles Δθ is Δl = P Δθ, where P is the coupling matrix. The rank of P determines the degree of underactuation.

Force Transmission: By the principle of virtual work, joint torques τ relate to tendon tensions f via τ = Pᵀ f.

Variable Transmission: For some designs, P varies with joint configuration due to changing moment arms or tendon wrapping. This configuration-dependence can be exploited to achieve different coupling ratios at different grasp phases (Birglen et al. 2008).

Friction and Hysteresis: Tendon friction introduces nonlinear, history‑dependent behavior. Common models include the Dahl model and the LuGre model (Canudas de Wit et al. 1995), which capture the gradual transition between static and kinetic friction regimes.

2.2 Hand Biomechanics and Underactuation

2.2.1 Kinematic Structure of the Human Hand

The human hand consists of 27 bones, including 8 carpals, 5 metacarpals, and 14 phalanges. The fingers (index, middle, ring, little) each have three phalanges (proximal, middle, distal) and three joints: metacarpophalangeal (MCP), proximal interphalangeal (PIP), and distal interphalangeal (DIP). The thumb has two phalanges and two joints: MCP and interphalangeal (IP), plus a carpometacarpal (CMC) joint that enables opposition.

Degrees of freedom vary across joints: MCP joints provide flexion/extension and abduction/adduction (2 DoF), while PIP and DIP joints provide only flexion/extension (1 DoF each). The thumb CMC is a saddle joint with 2–3 DoF. Total DoF ranges from 21 to 27 depending on modeling choices.

2.2.2 Underactuated Finger Mechanisms

Underactuation—using fewer actuators than degrees of freedom—has emerged as a key principle for achieving adaptability with minimal complexity. Underactuated fingers automatically conform to object shape through passive compliance. The fundamental architecture uses a single actuator to drive multiple joints via a mechanism that distributes motion.

Comprehensive Treatment: Birglen, Gosselin, and Laliberté (2008) provided the foundational text Underactuated Robotic Hands, systematically analyzing various linkage and tendon-driven architectures. Dollar and Howe (2010) investigated the role of joint coupling in adaptive grasping, demonstrating how coupling ratios affect the speed and reliability of grasp formation. The RBO SoftHand (Deimel & Brock 2016) and Robotiq adaptive grippers represent successful commercial implementations.

The coupling matrix P determines how actuator displacement distributes among joints. For a two‑joint finger, typical coupling is P = [1; k], meaning that for a unit actuator displacement, the proximal joint moves by 1 unit and the distal joint by k units.

2.2.3 The Coupling–Adaptation Paradox

A fundamental trade‑off in underactuated fingers is between joint coupling (all joints moving simultaneously) and shape adaptation (joints stopping sequentially upon contact). High coupling (k near 1) gives simultaneous motion but poor adaptation; low coupling (k ≪ 1) gives sequential motion (good adaptation) but slow grasp formation.

Recent patents (e.g., Gosselin & Laliberté 2014, US Patent 8,870,269) discuss "coupled-adaptive" mode-switching mechanisms that attempt to resolve this paradox through variable transmission or differential mechanisms. However, a rigorous geometric characterization has been lacking—a gap this dissertation addresses through the introduction of an adaptation index.

2.3 Architectural and Design Thinking

2.3.1 Adaptability in Architecture

Architecture has long grappled with designing for change. Brand (1994) identified six layers of building adaptation, each with different timescales: site (eternal), structure (30–300 years), skin (20 years), services (7–15 years), space plan (3–30 years), and stuff (daily). This layering suggests that adaptability requires designing at multiple timescales simultaneously—a principle directly applicable to hand design, where kinematic structure, actuation, sensing, and control operate on different timescales.

Hertzberger (2005) concept of polyvalence—designing elements that accommodate multiple uses without physical change—offers another key insight. A well‑designed underactuated finger is polyvalent: it adapts to different object shapes without active reconfiguration.

2.3.2 Tectonics and Mechanical Legibility

Tectonics, as developed by Frampton (2007), refers to the expressive potential of constructional logic—the way structural principles become visible and meaningful in the finished work. Applied to hand design, tectonics suggests that the mechanical logic of actuation and transmission should be expressed rather than concealed.

While "tectonics" specifically has not been applied to prosthetic design, adjacent fields such as expressive robotics (Hoffman 2013) and legible robot motion (Dragan et al. 2013) have explored how form and motion communicate intent. We extend these ideas by proposing that a tectonically designed hand is mechanically legible—its form reveals its function, reducing cognitive load for the user and potentially increasing trust. This reframes tectonic qualities from mere aesthetics to cognitive ergonomics.

2.3.3 Pattern Languages and Spatial Grammars

Alexander's (1977) pattern language provides a method for codifying design knowledge at multiple scales. Each pattern describes a recurring problem and its core solution, expressed in a form that allows combination with other patterns. Applied to manipulation, a pattern language would capture recurring grasp types, finger configurations, and movement sequences.

No prior application of Alexander's pattern language exists in the hand design literature. Kinematic synergies (Santello et al. 1998) capture similar ideas mathematically but lack the contextual documentation and design guidance that patterns provide.

Spatial grammars—rule‑based systems for generating spatial configurations—offer a complementary formalism. A spatial grammar for hand movements would consist of primitives (fundamental movement elements), rules (ways of combining primitives), and constraints (conditions for valid configurations).

2.4 Identified Research Gaps

The literature review reveals several gaps that this dissertation addresses:

1. Unified Integration of Existing Mathematical Frameworks: While screw theory and port‑Hamiltonian systems have been applied individually to manipulators and fingers (Wassink et al. 2010; Dai 2009), no existing work integrates them into a comprehensive framework for hand modeling that also incorporates design-oriented representations.
2. Formal Characterization of the Coupling–Adaptation Trade-off: The coupling–adaptation paradox lacks a rigorous mathematical formulation that could guide mechanism design and optimization.
3. Design‑Oriented Representations: Despite the obvious parallels between hand design and architecture, no systematic effort has applied architectural theories—pattern languages, spatial grammars, tectonics—to hand movement analysis.
4. Integration of Mathematics and Design: There is no formal methodology for translating between mathematical descriptions (joint angles, forces) and design representations (patterns, grammars), limiting the ability to combine analytical rigor with human‑centered creativity.
5. Theoretical Design Tools for Hand Mechanisms: Existing design tools for robotic hands are either purely analytical or purely empirical. A theoretical framework that unifies functional metrics (like adaptation) with human-centered metrics (like legibility) is lacking.

---

Chapter 3: Geometric Framework for Hand Modeling

3.1 Mathematical Preliminaries

3.1.1 Lie Groups and the Special Euclidean Group SE(3)

The set of all rigid body motions in three‑dimensional space forms the special Euclidean group SE(3). An element of SE(3) can be represented as a pair (R, p) where R ∈ SO(3) is a rotation matrix and p ∈ ℝ³ is a translation vector. Group multiplication is (R₁, p₁)·(R₂, p₂) = (R₁R₂, R₁p₂ + p₁).

SE(3) is a six‑dimensional Lie group. Its Lie algebra se(3) consists of twists ξ = (v, ω) where v ∈ ℝ³ is linear velocity and ω ∈ ℝ³ is angular velocity. The exponential map exp: se(3) → SE(3) converts twists to rigid motions. For a twist ξ = (v, ω) with θ = ‖ω‖, the exponential is given by the Rodrigues formula. For the special case ω = 0 (pure translation), exp(ξ̂) = (I, v).

3.1.2 Screw Theory and the Product of Exponentials

A screw is a geometric entity comprising a line in space (the screw axis) and a pitch. The instantaneous motion of a rigid body can be represented as a twist—the velocity analogue of a screw. For a revolute joint with axis ω (unit vector) and point q on the axis, the screw axis is S = [-ω×q; ω]. For a prismatic joint with direction v, the screw axis is S = [v; 0].

The product of exponentials formula expresses the forward kinematics of an n-joint manipulator as T(θ) = exp([S₁]θ₁) exp([S₂]θ₂) … exp([S_n]θ_n) M, where [S_i] is the 4×4 matrix representation of the screw axis, and M is the home configuration.

3.1.3 Port‑Hamiltonian Systems on Manifolds

A port‑Hamiltonian system is defined on a manifold X with Hamiltonian H: X → ℝ. The dynamics are ẋ = [J(x) - R(x)] (∂H/∂x)(x) + g(x)u, y = gᵀ(x) (∂H/∂x)(x), with J(x) skew‑symmetric, R(x) ≥ 0, and (u, y) power‑conjugate ports. This formulation preserves the geometric structure and energy properties of the system.

Following Wassink et al. (2010), we extend this to tendon-driven fingers by including tendon elongation states ℓ and elastic elements: x = [q; p; ℓ], H(q,p,ℓ) = ½ pᵀ M⁻¹(q) p + V(q) + ½ ℓᵀ K_e ℓ, where K_e represents tendon elasticity, M(q) is the inertia matrix, and V(q) includes gravitational and elastic potential energy.

3.2 Kinematic Modeling via Product of Exponentials

3.2.1 Finger as an Open Kinematic Chain

Consider a finger with n joints. Let the base frame be attached to the palm, and let M ∈ SE(3) be the fingertip pose when all joint angles are zero. For each joint i, define a screw axis S_i expressed in the base frame. The forward kinematics are T(θ) = exp([S₁]θ₁) exp([S₂]θ₂) … exp([S_n]θ_n) M.

For a typical finger, joints alternate between flexion/extension axes (perpendicular to finger plane) and abduction/adduction axes (orthogonal to flexion axes). The screw axes reflect this geometry.

3.2.2 Incorporating Multiple Fingers and the Thumb

A full hand model consists of five fingers, each described by its own product of exponentials. The thumb requires special attention due to its opposable saddle joint, which can be modeled as two intersecting revolute axes following Dai's (2009) screw-based thumb representation.

Let T_f(θ_f) denote the fingertip pose of finger f as a function of its joint angles θ_f. The overall hand configuration is the tuple (θ₁, …, θ₅).

3.2.3 Configuration Space and Its Topology

The configuration space of a single finger is a product of circles (for revolute joints) and lines (for prismatic joints), i.e., an n-dimensional torus Tⁿ if all joints are revolute. For the whole hand, the configuration space is the product of the individual finger spaces: C = Tⁿ¹ × Tⁿ² × … × Tⁿ⁵. This space has the topology of a high‑dimensional torus. Understanding its geometry is essential for analyzing hand movements and planning motions.

3.3 Dynamic Modeling with Port‑Hamiltonian Systems

3.3.1 Hamiltonian Formulation for Multi‑Segment Fingers

For a finger with n segments, choose generalized coordinates q ∈ ℝⁿ (joint angles) and generalized momenta p = M(q) q̇, where M(q) is the inertia matrix. The Hamiltonian is H(q, p) = ½ pᵀ M⁻¹(q) p + V(q), where V(q) includes gravitational and elastic potential energy.

The port‑Hamiltonian dynamics are:
[ q̇; ṗ ] = ( [0 I; -I 0] - [0 0; 0 R(q,p)] ) [∂H/∂q; ∂H/∂p] + [0; B(q)] u,
y = Bᵀ(q) ∂H/∂p = Bᵀ(q) M⁻¹(q) p.

3.3.2 Tendon Transmission and the Coupling Matrix

The input matrix B(q) maps tendon forces u to joint torques. For a tendon‑driven finger with m tendons, the relationship is τ = Pᵀ(q) f, where P(q) is the coupling matrix. Following Wassink et al. (2010), the coupling matrix relates to the geometric Jacobian J(q) through Pᵀ(q) = J_aᵀ(q) J_tendon(q), where J_a captures actuator coupling and J_tendon maps tendon velocities to joint velocities. For constant tendon moment arms, P is constant; for designs with wrapping or variable-radius pulleys, P(q) becomes configuration-dependent—a feature that can be exploited to achieve variable coupling ratios.

3.3.3 Dissipation and Friction Modeling

Dissipation R(q, p) captures friction at joints and along tendons. A common model is Rayleigh dissipation: R(q, p) = [0 0; 0 D(q, q̇)], where D(q, q̇) is a positive definite matrix representing joint damping and tendon friction. For tendon friction, the LuGre model (Canudas de Wit et al. 1995) can be incorporated by augmenting the state with internal friction states z: ż = ℓ̇ - σ₀ |ℓ̇|/g(ℓ̇) z, F_fric = σ₀ z + σ₁ ż + σ₂ ℓ̇, where σ₀, σ₁, σ₂ are friction parameters and g(ℓ̇) captures the Stribeck effect.

3.4 Underactuation and the Coupling–Adaptation Paradox

3.4.1 Mathematical Characterization of Underactuated Fingers

An underactuated finger has fewer actuators than degrees of freedom: m < n. The dynamics become τ = Pᵀ f, with rank(P) = m. The nullspace of Pᵀ represents directions in torque space that cannot be directly actuated. These directions are governed by passive elements (springs, mechanical limits) and contact forces.

Following Wassink et al. (2010), we represent the underactuated dynamics as ẋ = [J(x) - R(x)] (∂H/∂x)(x) + g(x)u + g_c(x)λ, where g_c(x)λ represents contact forces and λ are Lagrange multipliers enforcing contact constraints.

3.4.2 The Adaptation Index: Quantifying the Paradox

We introduce a geometric metric to quantify the coupling–adaptation trade-off. Let P ∈ ℝⁿᵐ be the coupling matrix.

Definition (Adaptation Index): The adaptation index of an underactuated finger with coupling matrix P is AI(P) = dim(ker(Pᵀ)) / rank(P).

For an n×m matrix with rank r, dim(ker(Pᵀ)) = n - r, so AI(P) = (n - r) / r.

This index measures the dimension of the subspace of joint torques that cannot be directly actuated, normalized by the number of actuated degrees of freedom. A fully actuated finger (r = n) has AI = 0, indicating no passive adaptation capability. A minimally underactuated finger (r = 1) has AI = n-1, indicating maximum potential for adaptation but minimal coordinated motion.

Remarks: The adaptation index depends only on the rank of P, not on the specific values within P. While this coarse measure captures the fundamental capacity for passive adaptation (the size of the nullspace), it does not reflect how the passive subspace is oriented relative to joint stiffness or contact geometries. For a more detailed analysis, complementary metrics are needed. In particular, we define the condition number of P as κ(P) = σ_max(P) / σ_min(P), where σ_max and σ_min are the largest and smallest singular values of P. This ratio captures the uniformity of coupling: a high condition number indicates that some actuated directions are much more effective than others, which can affect the finger's ability to transmit forces evenly. Two coupling matrices with the same rank but different κ can have markedly different mechanical behavior. For example, P₁ = [1, 1; 0.1, 0.1]ᵀ and P₂ = [1, 0.1; 0.1, 1]ᵀ both have rank 2 but very different condition numbers, leading to different force transmission characteristics. Thus AI serves as a first-order characterization, sufficient for comparing mechanisms with different degrees of underactuation, while κ provides additional insight when comparing mechanisms with the same rank but different coupling structures.

Definition (Coupling Index): The coupling index measures how well the actuated motions align with a desired grasp synergy vector c ∈ ℝⁿ: CI(P, c) = ‖P P⁺ c‖ / ‖c‖, where P⁺ is the pseudoinverse of P. CI = 1 indicates that c lies entirely in the column space of P (perfect coupling); CI = 0 indicates c is orthogonal to the actuated subspace.

3.4.3 Distinction from Classical Manipulability

While Yoshikawa's (1985) manipulability ellipsoid √det(JJᵀ) quantifies the ability to generate velocity in task space, the adaptation index quantifies the structural capacity for passive conformation. Manipulability is about active control authority; AI is about passive mechanical intelligence. A finger can have high AI (good adaptation) but low manipulability (poor force transmission) if the coupling matrix is ill-conditioned. This distinction is crucial for design.

The coupling–adaptation paradox can now be stated geometrically:

Theorem (Paradox as Geometric Constraint): For any constant coupling matrix P, there exists a fundamental trade-off between adaptation and coupling. Specifically, for any desired synergy vector c, the product AI(P) · CI(P, c) is bounded above by a function of the condition number of P and the alignment of c with the column space. High AI (large nullspace) necessarily limits the ability to achieve arbitrary coupled motions, and vice versa. The condition number amplifies the trade-off when P is ill-conditioned.

Proof Sketch: Let P have singular value decomposition P = U Σ Vᵀ, with Σ = diag(σ₁,…,σ_m) and σ₁ ≥ … ≥ σ_m > 0. Then rank(P) = m, and dim(ker(Pᵀ)) = n - m. Thus AI = (n-m)/m. For any unit vector c, the projection onto the column space is P P⁺ c = U Ũᵀ c, where Ũ consists of the first m columns of U. The norm ‖P P⁺ c‖ is maximized when c lies in the subspace spanned by the first m left singular vectors, and minimized when orthogonal. Specifically, ‖P P⁺ c‖ = √(∑{i=1}^m (u_iᵀ c)²). The factor σ_max/σ_min = σ₁/σ_m is the condition number κ(P). The term ‖c‖/‖P⁺c‖ equals 1/√(∑{i=1}^m (u_iᵀ c)² / σ_i²). Combining these, we obtain an inequality bounding the product AI·CI by a function that increases with κ and decreases with the alignment of c. The detailed derivation uses the Cauchy–Schwarz inequality and the fact that ∑ (u_iᵀ c)² ≤ 1. For equality, c must be a singular vector corresponding to σ₁ and also satisfy specific orthogonality conditions.

This theorem formalizes the intuitive notion that high adaptation (large nullspace) necessarily limits the ability to achieve arbitrary coupled motions, and vice versa. The condition number amplifies the trade-off when P is ill-conditioned.

3.4.4 Toward Resolution: Variable Transmission and Reconfiguration

A complete resolution of the paradox requires mechanisms that can change P during the grasp or introduce additional constraints. The port-Hamiltonian framework naturally accommodates such extensions:

· Variable Transmission: Let P(q) be configuration-dependent. Then the adaptation index becomes a local quantity AI(P(q)) = (n - rank(P(q))) / rank(P(q)), which can vary during motion. Optimal designs might have high AI during approach (for adaptation) and low AI during power grasp (for stability).
· Joint Locks: Following Wassink et al. (2010), we model joint locks as discrete reconfiguration events that temporarily increase rank(P) by locking degrees of freedom. This can be represented as switching between Dirac structures in the port-Hamiltonian formulation.
· Mode-Switching Mechanisms: Recent patents (e.g., Gosselin & Laliberté 2014) describe mechanisms that switch between coupled and adaptive modes. In our framework, these correspond to discrete changes in P at specific configurations, representable as hybrid port-Hamiltonian systems with state-triggered switching.

3.5 Theoretical Design Exploration

To illustrate the framework's utility as a conceptual design tool, we consider a theoretical design space for a 2-DOF underactuated finger (MCP and PIP joints, one actuator). The design variables are the coupling ratio k in P = [1, k]ᵀ, the spring stiffnesses K₁ and K₂ at the two joints, and a binary variable s indicating whether tendons are sheathed (opacity 0.8) or exposed (opacity 0). We define two objectives:

· Functional: Maximize coupling index CI(P, c) for a desired power grasp synergy c = [1,1]ᵀ. For a 2-DOF finger, CI(P,c) = |1+k| / √(2(1+k²)).
· Tectonic: Maximize mechanical legibility ML = TVI, where TVI = 1/(1 + s·0.8) (simplified proxy).

We explore the Pareto frontier by varying k continuously and s discretely. The trade-off is clear: higher k (near 1) gives better coupling but may require sheathing that reduces legibility; lower k gives worse coupling but allows exposed tendons. The Pareto frontier reveals that for any desired level of coupling, the best tectonic design is the one with highest TVI achievable at that coupling. This theoretical exercise demonstrates how the framework enables quantitative trade-off analysis without requiring physical implementation.

---

Chapter 4: Architectural-Design Framework for Hand Representation

4.1 Spatial Grammars for Hand Movements

4.1.1 Algebraic Formalization

We define a spatial grammar G = (P, R, C) where:

· Primitives P: Each primitive is a triple (ϕ, j, θ) representing a fundamental movement. More generally, a primitive can be represented as an element of SE(3) or its Lie algebra, capturing the net motion of a segment. For example:
  · Flexion: Flex(ϕ, j) ↦ θⱼ ← ϕ with ϕ ∈ [ϕ_min, ϕ_max]
  · Extension: Ext(ϕ, j) ↦ θⱼ ← -ϕ
  · Abduction: Abd(ϕ, j) ↦ θⱼ ← ϕ (for abduction joints)
  · Adduction: Add(ϕ, j) ↦ θⱼ ← -ϕ
  · Opposition: Opp(α) ↦ sequence of thumb CMC rotations
  In the SE(3) interpretation, a flexion primitive corresponds to a one-parameter subgroup generated by the screw axis of that joint.
· Rules R: Rules are composition operations on primitives:
  · Sequence: Seq(α, β) = β ∘ α (function composition in configuration space)
  · Parallel: Par(α, β) = α × β (product in configuration space)
  · Repeat: Rep(α, n) = αⁿ (n-fold composition)
  · Conditional: Cond(cond, α, β) = α if cond true else β
· Constraints C: Constraints are inequalities on configuration variables:
  · Joint limits: θⱼ_min ≤ θⱼ ≤ θⱼ_max
  · Penetration avoidance: dist(T_f(θ_f), T_g(θ_g)) ≥ ε for f ≠ g
  · Force closure: rank(G) = 6 where G is the grasp matrix in screw coordinates

4.1.2 Generating Hand Configurations

Starting from an initial configuration θ⁽⁰⁾ (e.g., open hand), the grammar generates new configurations by applying rules. Each rule application defines a mapping r: C → C.

For example, a precision pinch might be generated as:
Par(Par(Flex(45°, MCP_index), Flex(45°, PIP_index)), Par(Flex(10°, DIP_index), Opp(thumb_to_index)))

The grammar defines a partial order on configurations, enabling hierarchical planning and description.

4.1.3 Expressiveness of the Grammar

The grammar G is capable of generating a wide range of hand configurations. In particular, because each revolute joint can be independently actuated by a primitive, and sequence and parallel rules allow any combination of joint angles, the grammar can generate all configurations that correspond to discrete combinations of primitive actions. However, since joint angles are continuous, the grammar's reachable set is a dense subset of the configuration space C (assuming primitives can be instantiated with any angle within joint limits). More formally, the grammar can generate any configuration that can be expressed as a finite composition of primitives with real parameters; this set is dense in C. Therefore, the grammar is sufficiently expressive to represent all grasp types in standard taxonomies such as Cutkosky's (1989) 16 grasps or Feix et al.'s (2016) 33 grasps, as each such grasp corresponds to a specific region in joint-angle space that can be approximated by appropriate primitive parameters and rule applications. The grammar also allows the inclusion of constraints that restrict the generated set to feasible configurations (e.g., joint limits). Thus, while we do not claim that the grammar generates every physically realizable configuration (a topological denseness claim would require proof beyond our scope), it is certainly expressive enough for design purposes.

4.1.4 Relation to Joint‑Angle Spaces

The grammar defines a mapping G: S → C from symbolic descriptions S to joint‑angle vectors. This mapping is many‑to‑one: multiple symbolic descriptions may correspond to the same joint‑angle configuration, reflecting different design interpretations. Conversely, a single symbolic description may correspond to a family of configurations parameterized by continuous parameters (e.g., flexion angles).

For theoretical analysis, we define an inverse mapping G⁻¹: C → 2^S that returns all symbolic descriptions consistent with a given configuration, using constraint satisfaction and pattern matching.

4.2 Pattern Languages for Grasping and Manipulation

4.2.1 Hierarchical Patterns: Finger, Hand, Task Scales

A pattern language organizes design knowledge at multiple scales. We document 20 patterns following Alexander's (1977) format, extended with mathematical realizations. Each pattern includes: Name, Context, Problem, Solution, Mathematical Realization, Force Closure Condition, Restraining Forces, Variations, Related Patterns. The set is drawn from and extends existing grasp taxonomies (Cutkosky 1989; Feix et al. 2016) and is intended to be representative rather than exhaustive.

Table 4.1: Finger-Scale Patterns

Name Context Problem Solution Mathematical Realization
F1: Adaptive Enclosure Unknown object shapes Finger must conform without active control Passive compliance via underactuation P rank 1, nullspace dimension ≥ 2, joint springs K_i, AI high
F2: Precision Point Small objects, high accuracy Need single-point contact with minimal disturbance Fingertip trajectory control with distal joint priority P with high distal coupling, low proximal, e.g., P=[1,0.2,0.05]ᵀ
F3: Sequential Flexion Objects with varying protrusions Joints must stop upon contact in proximal-to-distal order Mechanical limits or increasing stiffness from proximal to distal K₁ < K₂ < K₃, P with decreasing gains
F4: Coupled Flexion Power grasp, speed priority All joints must move together for fast enclosure High coupling ratio (k≈1), minimal compliance P = [1,1,1]ᵀ, K_i high
F5: Abduction/Adduction Lateral grasping, precision Finger must move sideways while maintaining posture Separate abduction DOF with independent actuation Full rank P for abduction subspace

Table 4.2: Hand-Scale Patterns

Name Context Problem Solution Mathematical Realization
H1: Power Grasp Large objects, high force All fingers flex to enclose object, thumb opposes Cylindrical enclosure with thumb in opposition θ_MCP∈[70°,90°], θ_PIP∈[80°,100°], thumb opposition
H2: Precision Pinch Small objects, fine manipulation Thumb opposes index fingertip Tripod configuration with minimal palm contact Index: θ_MCP≈45°, θ_PIP≈45°, θ_DIP≈10°; thumb opposes
H3: Lateral Pinch Thin objects, keys, cards Thumb opposes side of index finger Index extended, thumb flexed to contact lateral surface Index MCP≈20°, PIP≈10°, thumb adducted
H4: Three‑Jaw Chuck Spherical objects, moderate precision Thumb, index, middle form tripod Triangular fingertip arrangement with object centered θ vectors for three fingers forming equilateral triangle in contact space
H5: Hook Grasp Carrying loads by handle Fingers flex to form hook, thumb may not engage Flexed fingers with straight wrists θ_MCP,θ_PIP∈[85°,95°], θ_DIP free
H6: Cylindrical Grasp Drinking vessels, tools Palm contact with fingers wrapped around Full finger flexion with palm contact θ_MCP≈θ_PIP≈θ_DIP≈90°
H7: Spherical Grasp Balls, rounded objects Fingers spread and flex to conform to sphere Abduction combined with flexion θ_abd > 0, θ_flex graded by finger length
H8: Tip Pinch Very small objects (needles) Fingertips only, minimal contact area Maximum precision with minimal force Minimal joint angles, high stiffness, θ_MCP≈10°, θ_PIP≈10°

Table 4.3: Task-Scale Patterns

Name Context Problem Solution Mathematical Realization
T1: Preshape Configuration Object approach phase Hand must adopt a shape that anticipates the grasp Configuration that is a scaled or offset version of the target grasp θ_preshape = α θ_grasp + β, with α,β chosen to open hand
T2: In‑Hand Manipulation Repositioning without release Move object within grasp Sequential finger motions maintaining force closure Time-varying θ satisfying force closure constraints
T3: Object Transfer Handover tasks Pass object from one hand to the other Coordinated release and acquisition between hands Two-hand configuration space with synchronization
T4: Tool Use Utensils, implements Adapt grasp to tool function Task-specific grasp with appropriate force transmission Grasp configuration optimized for tool dynamics
T5: Precision-to-Power Transition Variable grip force Change from precision to power grasp during task Smooth trajectory between configurations Interpolated path in configuration space

Each pattern also includes restraining forces (e.g., friction, joint limits, tendon slack) that can prevent successful implementation—omitted here for brevity.

4.3 Tectonics and Mechanical Legibility

4.3.1 Expressing Mechanical Logic Through Form

Tectonics, as a design philosophy, holds that the constructional logic of an artifact should be expressed in its form. For a hand, this means:

· Tendon paths should be visible where feasible, showing how force is transmitted.
· Joints should be articulated clearly, revealing degrees of freedom.
· Actuators should be located in a way that communicates their role.
· Sensors should be integrated as deliberate design elements.

While tectonics originates in architecture, its principles align with a critical need in modern Human-Robot Interaction (HRI): mechanical legibility. Dragan et al. (2013) define legibility as the ability of an observer to quickly and confidently infer a robot's goal from its motion. We extend this concept from motion to structure. A tectonically designed hand is mechanically legible—its form communicates its function, reducing the cognitive load on the user and potentially increasing trust (Hoffman 2013). Thus, our tectonic proxies are not merely aesthetic metrics but theoretical proxies for cognitive accessibility.

4.3.2 Quantitative Proxies for Tectonic Qualities

To make tectonic design actionable, we propose quantitative proxies. These are theoretical constructs intended to illustrate how tectonic qualities could be measured; empirical validation through user studies is necessary to confirm their correlation with actual legibility and acceptance.

Definition (Tendon Visibility Index, TVI): TVI = (L_exposed / L_total) · 1/(1 + sheath_opacity), where L_exposed is the length of visible tendon, L_total is total tendon length, and sheath_opacity ∈ [0,1] measures how much sheathing conceals the tendon. The denominator reflects that opaque sheathing reduces visibility nonlinearly; the linear form is a first approximation.

Definition (Articulation Exposure Score, AES): AES = (∑ᵢ exposed_DOFᵢ · wᵢ) / (∑ᵢ total_DOFᵢ · wᵢ), where exposed_DOFᵢ counts degrees of freedom at joint i that are visibly articulated, and wᵢ weights joints by importance (e.g., derived from grasp frequency or biomechanical significance).

Definition (Force Flow Clarity, FFC): FFC = 1 / (1 + path_curvature + hidden_guides), where path_curvature measures deviation from straight lines (e.g., total curvature integrated along tendon path), and hidden_guides counts concealed redirection points (pulleys). This metric assumes that straight, visible force paths are more legible.

These proxies can be incorporated into multi-objective optimization alongside functional metrics, enabling trade-off analysis between tectonic expression and other design goals.

4.3.3 Tendon‑Driven Systems as Tectonic Elements

Tendon‑driven systems have inherent tectonic qualities. The tension elements contrast with compression elements (finger links), creating visual tension that communicates force flow. Pulleys become expressive joints, redirecting tendons in visible ways. A tectonically designed hand reveals its operation through its appearance.

Design Guidelines:

· Use transparent or translucent sheathing where tendon concealment is necessary.
· Expose tendons at joints to show redirection.
· Design pulleys as visible, expressive elements rather than hiding them within links.
· Color-code tendon groups by function (flexion, extension, abduction).
· Express stiffness differences through material choices (compliant sections visually distinct from rigid).

4.3.4 Aesthetic and Psychological Dimensions

For prosthetic hands especially, aesthetic considerations are crucial. Users must be comfortable wearing the device in social situations. A tectonic approach offers a middle path between realistic (cosmetic) prosthetics and purely mechanical devices: rather than hiding mechanics, it celebrates mechanical logic while achieving visual harmony through proportion, material quality, and detail refinement.

Studies (Biddiss & Chau 2008; Cordella et al. 2016) show that prosthetic abandonment correlates strongly with appearance and perceived naturalness. Tectonic design addresses these factors by making the mechanical logic legible and aesthetically coherent, potentially improving acceptance rates.

4.4 Adaptability as a Design Philosophy

4.4.1 Layered Adaptability in Architecture and Robotics

Brand's (1994) concept of layered adaptability applies directly to hand design:

· Kinematic structure: Changes rarely (if at all) during the hand's lifetime (shearing layers: structure).
· Actuation system: May be upgraded or reconfigured on a longer timescale (services).
· Sensing layer: Can be augmented with additional sensors (space plan).
· Control software: Can be updated frequently (stuff).
· Grasp strategies: Adapt in real time to task demands (stuff).

Designing for adaptability means considering all these layers and their interactions.

4.4.2 Polyvalence and Underactuation

Hertzberger's (2005) polyvalence—designing elements that accommodate multiple uses without physical change—is realized in underactuated fingers. A well‑designed underactuated finger adapts to different object shapes without requiring active control of each joint. The passive mechanics provide polyvalence.

We propose a polyvalence index for an underactuated finger, acknowledging that it can be interpreted either empirically or mathematically:

Definition (Polyvalence Index, Empirical): PI_emp = (Number of distinct graspable object classes) / (Number of actuators). This is an empirical quantity that must be determined through experimentation with a standardized object set (e.g., the YCB object set or a taxonomy like Feix et al. 2016).

Definition (Polyvalence Index, Theoretical): PI_theo = (Volume of object-space region for which a stable grasp exists) / (Number of actuators). This mathematical interpretation requires defining a metric on object space and a grasp quality function. For example, one could consider the set of object diameters d for which a stable power grasp can be achieved, normalized by actuator count. This remains a theoretical construct pending further development.

4.4.3 Designing for Multiple Timescales

The mathematical framework of Chapter 3, with its separation of kinematic, dynamic, and control layers, naturally supports layered adaptability. The port‑Hamiltonian formulation, in particular, allows modular composition and replacement of subsystems, facilitating design changes at different timescales.

---

Chapter 5: Integration of Mathematical and Architectural Representations

5.1 Formal Mappings Between Representations

5.1.1 From Joint Angles to Design Patterns

Given a joint‑angle vector θ, we can identify which design pattern(s) it instantiates through a nearest-neighbor classification in configuration space:

1. Define pattern templates R_k as regions in joint‑angle space: R_k = {θ: θ_min_k ≤ θ ≤ θ_max_k, force_closure(θ) = True}.
2. Compute distance d(θ, R_k) = min_{θ'∈R_k} ‖θ - θ'‖_W, where W weights joints by importance (e.g., derived from the pattern's own importance weights).
3. Classify θ as pattern k if d(θ, R_k) < ε and ε is smallest across all k.

For patterns with continuous parameters (e.g., grasp size), we also compute the best-fit parameters via optimization: min_α ‖θ - θ_k(α)‖² subject to θ_k(α) ∈ R_k.

Conversely, given a pattern p and parameters α (e.g., object size), we generate a representative θ through inverse kinematics or optimization: min_θ ‖T(θ) - T_desired‖² subject to pattern constraints.

5.1.2 From Spatial Grammar to Kinematic Constraints

A spatial grammar rule, such as Par(Flex(ϕ₁, j₁), Flex(ϕ₂, j₂)), imposes constraints on the joint angles: θⱼ₁ = ϕ₁, θⱼ₂ = ϕ₂. More complex rules may involve inequalities (e.g., Cond(contact, Stop, Continue)). These constraints define admissible subsets of the configuration space.

The grammar generates a constraint satisfaction problem that can be solved numerically: Given grammar G and start configuration θ₀, find θ such that θ = G(θ₀) satisfies all constraints.

5.1.3 Tectonic Qualities and Mechanical Parameters

Tectonic qualities relate to mechanical parameters through the proxies defined in Section 4.3.2:

· TVI = f(routing geometry, sheath material)
· AES = g(joint cover design, bearing exposure)
· FFC = h(path curvature, guide visibility)

These relationships are implemented as functions mapping CAD parameters to tectonic scores, enabling theoretical optimization: min_design_parameters [ w₁·functional_cost + w₂·tectonic_cost ].

5.1.4 Correspondences Between Design and Configuration Spaces

The mappings defined above establish correspondences between the space of design patterns and the submanifolds of the configuration space that realize those patterns. Each pattern corresponds to a region (possibly with parameters) in configuration space, and each configuration belongs to one or more pattern regions. This dual representation allows designers to reason in pattern space while ensuring mathematical consistency with the underlying kinematics and dynamics.

5.2 Dual Representation and Design Space Exploration

5.2.1 Maintaining Both Descriptions Simultaneously

A dual representation maintains both the mathematical description (θ, P, M, etc.) and the design description (pattern instances, grammar rules, tectonic qualities) simultaneously through a unified theoretical construct. This allows:

· Analysis: Starting from a mathematical model, identify the design patterns it supports.
· Synthesis: Starting from a design concept, generate mathematical models that realize it.
· Iteration: Modify one representation and see the effect on the other.

5.2.2 Exploring Design Alternatives with Mathematical Guidance

Design space exploration combines mathematical optimization with design reasoning:

1. Define a set of candidate design patterns (from the pattern language).
2. For each pattern, generate a family of mathematical models parameterized by continuous variables (e.g., joint ranges, spring constants, coupling ratios).
3. Use optimization to find parameter values that satisfy constraints and optimize performance metrics (e.g., adaptation index, grasp stability).
4. Evaluate the resulting designs against tectonic criteria (TVI, AES, FFC).
5. Iterate, refining patterns and parameters.

Optimization Formulation:
min_x [f₁(x), f₂(x), f₃(x)]
subject to:

· gⱼ(x) ≤ 0 (kinematic constraints)
· h_k(x) = 0 (pattern-specific constraints)
· x ∈ X (design parameter bounds)

where f₁ = functional cost (e.g., -AI), f₂ = -CI (for desired synergies), f₃ = -tectonic scores.

5.2.3 Theoretical Pareto Optimal Design Exploration

We now demonstrate the dual representation through a theoretical Pareto optimization of a 2-DOF underactuated finger (MCP and PIP joints, one actuator). The design variables are the coupling ratio k in P = [1, k]ᵀ and a binary variable s indicating whether tendons are sheathed (opacity 0.8) or exposed (opacity 0). We define two objectives:

· Functional: Maximize coupling index CI(P, c) for a desired power grasp synergy c = [1,1]ᵀ. For a 2-DOF finger, CI(P,c) = |1+k| / √(2(1+k²)).
· Tectonic: Maximize mechanical legibility ML = TVI, where TVI = 1/(1 + s·0.8) (simplified proxy).

We explore the Pareto frontier by varying k continuously from 0.1 to 1.0 and s ∈ {0,1}. The trade-off is evident: higher k gives better coupling but may require sheathing that reduces legibility; lower k gives worse coupling but allows exposed tendons. The Pareto frontier reveals that for any desired level of coupling, the best tectonic design is the one with highest TVI achievable at that coupling. This theoretical exercise illustrates how the framework enables quantitative trade-off analysis without requiring physical implementation.

5.3 Implications for Prosthetic and Robotic Hand Design

5.3.1 Human‑Centered Design Principles

The integrated framework supports human‑centered design by:

· Involving users early: Pattern language provides a vocabulary for users to express needs.
· Iterative prototyping: Dual representation enables rapid exploration of alternatives.
· Aesthetic integration: Tectonic principles ensure that functional design also yields pleasing form.
· Customization: Patterns can be selected and parameterized for individual user needs.

5.3.2 Bridging Mathematical Optimization and User Acceptance

Mathematical optimization can produce highly functional designs, but user acceptance depends on factors beyond raw performance. The framework bridges this gap by:

· Encoding user preferences as constraints or objectives in the optimization (e.g., "visibility of moving parts" as tectonic score).
· Using pattern languages to ensure designs align with user expectations (e.g., "this should move like a human finger").
· Applying tectonic principles to create visually appealing devices that communicate their function.

5.3.3 Toward a Unified Design Methodology

The integrated framework suggests a unified methodology for hand design:

1. Requirements analysis: Use pattern language to capture user needs and task contexts.
2. Concept generation: Use spatial grammar to generate alternative configurations.
3. Mathematical modeling: Develop kinematic and dynamic models for each concept.
4. Optimization: Refine parameters to meet performance targets using the adaptation index and other metrics.
5. Tectonic refinement: Adjust design to enhance expression and aesthetics using quantitative proxies.
6. Iteration: Return to concept generation or modeling as needed.

This methodology combines the rigor of mathematics with the creativity of design, leading to hands that are both highly functional and deeply human‑centered.

5.4 Theoretical Algorithms for Dual Representation

To operationalize the dual representation, we provide algorithmic descriptions that formalize the mappings between mathematical and design spaces.

POE Kinematics Algorithm:

```
function poe_forward_kinematics(screw_axes, theta, M):
    T = M
    for i from n down to 1:
        T = exp_twist(screw_axes[i], theta[i]) @ T
    return T
```

Port-Hamiltonian Dynamics Formulation:

```
function port_hamiltonian_dynamics(t, x, params):
    q = x[0:n]; p = x[n:2n]; ell = x[2n:]
    H = 0.5 pᵀ inv(M(q)) p + V(q) + 0.5 ellᵀ K_e ell
    dH_dq = grad_V(q) + 0.5 pᵀ d_invM_dq(q) p
    dH_dp = inv(M(q)) p
    dH_dell = K_e ell
    
    J = [[0, I, 0], [-I, 0, 0], [0, 0, 0]]
    R = diag([0, D, R_tendon])
    B = [0; P(q)ᵀ; 0]
    u = control_law(t, q, p, ell)
    
    dx = (J - R) @ [dH_dq; dH_dp; dH_dell] + B @ u
    return dx
```

Pattern Classification Algorithm:

```
function classify_grasp(theta, pattern_library, W):
    best_pattern = None
    min_dist = ∞
    for pattern in pattern_library:
        if any(theta < pattern.theta_min) or any(theta > pattern.theta_max):
            continue
        if not force_closure(theta, pattern.object):
            continue
        diff = theta - pattern.nominal
        dist = sqrt(sum(W * diff²))
        if dist < min_dist:
            min_dist = dist
            best_pattern = pattern
    return best_pattern, min_dist
```

Tectonic Score Calculation:

```
function tectonic_scores(design):
    exposed_length = sum(seg.length for seg in design.tendons if seg.visible)
    total_length = sum(seg.length for seg in design.tendons)
    sheath_opacity = mean([seg.sheath.opacity for seg in design.tendons if hasattr(seg, 'sheath')])
    TVI = (exposed_length / total_length) / (1 + sheath_opacity)
    
    aes_numer = 0; aes_denom = 0
    for joint in design.joints:
        aes_numer += joint.exposed_dof * joint.importance
        aes_denom += joint.total_dof * joint.importance
    AES = aes_numer / aes_denom if aes_denom > 0 else 0
    
    path_curvature = mean([seg.curvature for seg in design.tendons])
    hidden_guides = sum(1 for guide in design.pulleys if guide.hidden)
    FFC = 1 / (1 + path_curvature + hidden_guides)
    
    return {'TVI': TVI, 'AES': AES, 'FFC': FFC}
```

These algorithms provide a theoretical foundation for implementing the dual representation in software, enabling automated exploration of the design space defined by the integrated framework.

---

Chapter 6: Conclusion

6.1 Summary of Contributions

This dissertation has developed a unified theoretical framework that integrates geometric mechanics with architectural‑design thinking for hand finger movement analysis. Building upon prior work in port-Hamiltonian finger modeling (Wassink et al. 2010) and screw-theoretic hand analysis (Dai 2009), the contributions are:

1. A Unified Geometric Framework: A comprehensive description of hand kinematics and dynamics using screw theory, Lie groups, and port‑Hamiltonian systems, extending prior applications to include variable transmission, reconfiguration, and design-oriented extensions. The framework captures both continuous motion and the discrete aspects of underactuation, providing a rigorous foundation for analysis and design.
2. Formal Characterization of the Coupling–Adaptation Paradox: A novel geometric characterization of the fundamental trade-off in underactuated finger design, including the adaptation index AI(P) = dim(ker(Pᵀ))/rank(P) that quantifies adaptive potential. While this index depends only on rank, it serves as a first-order measure, and complementary metrics such as the condition number κ(P) are introduced to capture uniformity of coupling. A theorem establishes the inherent conflict between coupling and adaptation, bounded by the condition number.
3. A Spatial Grammar for Hand Movements: A formal rule‑based system for generating and describing hand configurations, defined algebraically with primitives as SE(3) elements, rules as composition operations, and constraints as inequalities on twists. The grammar is shown to be sufficiently expressive to generate all grasp types in standard taxonomies, and its relation to configuration space is established.
4. An Expanded Pattern Language for Grasping: A hierarchical catalogue of 20 grasp patterns at finger, hand, and task scales, documented with mathematical realizations (joint-angle ranges, force distributions, screw-theoretic grasp qualities) and design guidelines. The patterns are drawn from and extend existing grasp taxonomies, with an explicit note that the set is representative rather than exhaustive.
5. Tectonic Principles with Quantitative Proxies for Mechanical Legibility: The first systematic application of architectural tectonics to hand design, including quantitative metrics (tendon visibility index TVI, articulation exposure score AES, force flow clarity FFC) that link mechanical expression to user acceptance and cognitive load. These are presented as theoretical proxies requiring empirical validation, grounded in concepts from human-robot interaction.
6. Formal Mappings and Dual Representation: A rigorous method for translating between joint‑angle descriptions and design patterns, including nearest-neighbor classification and grammar-based generation. These mappings establish correspondences between the space of design patterns and the submanifolds of the configuration space that realize those patterns, enabling dual representation and integrated design space exploration.
7. Theoretical Pareto Analysis of Design Trade-offs: A theoretical exploration of the design space for underactuated fingers, illustrating Pareto-optimal trade-offs between functional adaptation (AI and CI) and mechanical legibility (TVI). This demonstrates the framework's utility as a conceptual design tool without requiring physical implementation.

6.2 Theoretical Implications

The integration of mathematics and design has several theoretical implications:

· Geometry as a common language: Geometric mechanics provides a natural bridge between the continuous world of physics and the discrete world of design patterns. The use of SE(3) and screw theory unifies kinematic, dynamic, and grasp analyses within a single mathematical framework that also accommodates spatial grammar rules.
· Layered adaptability: The concept of layered adaptability from architecture (Brand 1994) offers a framework for understanding how hands change at different timescales, from real-time grasp adaptation to long-term reconfiguration. This aligns naturally with the modular structure of port-Hamiltonian systems.
· Polyvalence and underactuation: Hertzberger's (2005) polyvalence illuminates the deep purpose of underactuation—to achieve multiple functions with minimal complexity. The adaptation index quantifies polyvalence in mechanical terms, creating a bridge between architectural theory and mechanism design.
· Tectonics and legibility: Tectonics reveals that mechanical design is not merely functional but also communicative, shaping user experience and acceptance. By linking tectonic proxies to cognitive load and trust (Dragan et al. 2013; Hoffman 2013), we ground aesthetic considerations in human-robot interaction research.

6.3 Limitations and Future Research Directions

This theoretical work has several limitations that open avenues for further investigation:

1. Empirical validation of tectonic proxies: User studies are needed to confirm whether TVI, AES, and FFC correlate with perceived legibility, trust, and acceptance. This would require building physical prototypes or high-fidelity renderings and conducting controlled experiments.
2. Grammar expressiveness: While we have argued that the grammar can generate a wide range of configurations, a formal proof of denseness or completeness would strengthen the claim. Future work could explore the grammar's generative power using formal language theory.
3. Extension to soft robotics: Generalize the screw-theoretic kinematics to accommodate continuous deformations in soft and continuum hands, preserving the port-Hamiltonian structure through infinite-dimensional Dirac structures. Recent work on geometric mechanics for soft robots (Rus & Tolley 2015; Boyer et al. 2020) could inform this extension.
4. Integration with machine learning: Explore how the pattern language can serve as a structured prior for learning grasping policies, enabling symbolic–continuous hybrid representations and grammar-based reinforcement learning. Geometric deep learning on Lie groups (Finzi et al. 2023) offers tools for this integration.
5. Variable transmission mechanisms: Extend the mathematical characterization of the coupling matrix to time-varying or state-dependent P(q), analyzing conditions for resolving the coupling–adaptation paradox through differential geometry and hybrid systems. The emergence of variable stiffness actuators (Vanderborght et al. 2013) provides a hardware motivation.
6. Higher‑order tectonics: Develop more sophisticated proxies for tectonic qualities, potentially linking them to information-theoretic measures of mechanical expression or to perceptual models from psychophysics.
7. Formal verification of grasp patterns: Use the mathematical constraints encoded in pattern templates to automatically verify that a given hand design can achieve all required patterns, perhaps through satisfiability modulo theories (SMT) solving.
8. Polyvalence index refinement: Develop a rigorous mathematical definition of PI_theo based on reachable grasp quality volumes, and explore its relationship to AI and other metrics.

These directions remain within the realm of theory, aiming to deepen and broaden the foundational framework established here. The ultimate goal is a comprehensive mathematical–design language that enables the creation of artificial hands which are not only functionally superior but also aesthetically pleasing, intuitively understandable, and deeply responsive to human needs—hands that are, in the fullest sense, works of both science and art.

---

Note: Citations in this document refer to the following works (full references available in the bibliography of the LaTeX version):
Alexander (1977), Biddiss & Chau (2008), Birglen et al. (2008), Borràs & Dollar (2014), Boyer et al. (2020), Brand (1994), Canudas de Wit et al. (1995), Cordella et al. (2016), Cutkosky (1989), Dai (2009), Deimel & Brock (2016), Denavit & Hartenberg (1955), Dollar & Howe (2010), Dragan et al. (2013), Feix et al. (2016), Ficuciello et al. (2010), Finzi et al. (2023), Frampton (2007), Gosselin & Laliberté (2014), Hertzberger (2005), Hoffman (2013), Murray et al. (1994), Rus & Tolley (2015), Santello et al. (1998), van der Schaft & Maschke (2002), Vanderborght et al. (2013), Wassink et al. (2010), Yoshikawa (1985).

Appendices

Appendix A: Mathematical Preliminaries

A.1 Lie Groups and Lie Algebras

A Lie group is a group that is also a smooth manifold, with the property that the group operations (multiplication and inversion) are smooth maps. The Lie algebra associated with a Lie group G is the tangent space at the identity, denoted \mathfrak{g} = T_eG, equipped with a bilinear, antisymmetric bracket [\cdot,\cdot]: \mathfrak{g}\times\mathfrak{g}\to\mathfrak{g} called the Lie bracket, which satisfies the Jacobi identity.

A.1.1 The Special Orthogonal Group SO(3)

SO(3) = \{R \in \mathbb{R}^{3\times3} \mid R^T R = I,\ \det R = +1\} is the group of rotations in \mathbb{R}^3. Its Lie algebra \mathfrak{so}(3) consists of skew-symmetric matrices:

\mathfrak{so}(3) = \{\hat{\omega} \in \mathbb{R}^{3\times3} \mid \hat{\omega}^T = -\hat{\omega}\}.

Every such matrix can be written as

\hat{\omega} = \begin{bmatrix} 0 & -\omega_3 & \omega_2 \\ \omega_3 & 0 & -\omega_1 \\ -\omega_2 & \omega_1 & 0 \end{bmatrix},

with \omega = (\omega_1,\omega_2,\omega_3) \in \mathbb{R}^3. The map \omega \mapsto \hat{\omega} is an isomorphism between \mathbb{R}^3 and \mathfrak{so}(3). The Lie bracket in \mathfrak{so}(3) corresponds to the cross product: [\hat{\omega}_1, \hat{\omega}_2] = \widehat{\omega_1 \times \omega_2}.

The exponential map \exp: \mathfrak{so}(3) \to SO(3) is given by Rodrigues' formula:

\exp(\hat{\omega}) = I + \frac{\sin\|\omega\|}{\|\omega\|} \hat{\omega} + \frac{1-\cos\|\omega\|}{\|\omega\|^2} \hat{\omega}^2,

with the convention that for \|\omega\| = 0, \exp(0) = I.

A.1.2 The Special Euclidean Group SE(3)

SE(3) = \{(R,p) \mid R \in SO(3), p \in \mathbb{R}^3\} is the group of rigid motions (rotations and translations). Group multiplication:

(R_1, p_1) \cdot (R_2, p_2) = (R_1R_2, R_1p_2 + p_1).

A convenient representation uses 4\times4 homogeneous matrices:

T = \begin{bmatrix} R & p \\ 0 & 1 \end{bmatrix} \in \mathbb{R}^{4\times4}.

Then multiplication corresponds to matrix multiplication.

The Lie algebra \mathfrak{se}(3) consists of matrices of the form

\hat{\xi} = \begin{bmatrix} \hat{\omega} & v \\ 0 & 0 \end{bmatrix} \in \mathbb{R}^{4\times4},

with \hat{\omega} \in \mathfrak{so}(3), v \in \mathbb{R}^3. The twist coordinates are \xi = (v, \omega) \in \mathbb{R}^6.

The exponential map \exp: \mathfrak{se}(3) \to SE(3) can be computed as:

\exp(\hat{\xi}) = \begin{bmatrix} \exp(\hat{\omega}) & \frac{1}{\|\omega\|^2}\big((I - \exp(\hat{\omega}))(\omega\times v) + \omega\omega^T v \|\omega\| \big) \\ 0 & 1 \end{bmatrix},

with the understanding that when \omega = 0 (pure translation), \exp(\hat{\xi}) = \begin{bmatrix} I & v \\ 0 & 1 \end{bmatrix}.

A.1.3 Adjoint Representation

For a Lie group G, the adjoint representation \Ad_g: \mathfrak{g} \to \mathfrak{g} is the differential of conjugation at the identity:

\Ad_g(\xi) = \frac{d}{dt}\big(g \exp(t\xi) g^{-1}\big)\big|_{t=0}.

For SE(3), if g = (R,p) and \xi = (v,\omega), then

\Ad_g(\xi) = (R v + p \times (R\omega),\, R\omega).

In matrix form (using homogeneous coordinates),

\Ad_g = \begin{bmatrix} R & \hat{p}R \\ 0 & R \end{bmatrix},

where \hat{p} is the skew-symmetric matrix of p.

The Lie algebra adjoint map \ad_\xi: \mathfrak{g} \to \mathfrak{g} is defined by \ad_\xi(\eta) = [\xi, \eta]. For \mathfrak{se}(3),

\ad_\xi = \begin{bmatrix} \hat{\omega} & \hat{v} \\ 0 & \hat{\omega} \end{bmatrix},

where \hat{v} is the skew-symmetric matrix of v.

A.2 Screw Theory

A screw is a geometric entity consisting of a line in space (the screw axis) and a scalar called the pitch. A twist \xi = (v,\omega) represents the instantaneous velocity of a rigid body. If \omega \neq 0, the screw axis is the line through the point

q = \frac{\omega \times v}{\|\omega\|^2}

in the direction \omega, and the pitch is

h = \frac{\omega \cdot v}{\|\omega\|^2}.

If \omega = 0 (pure translation), the screw axis is the line through the origin in the direction v, and the pitch is infinite (or conventionally, a translational screw).

The screw coordinates of a joint are often given as a unit twist (normalized so that \|\omega\| = 1 for revolute joints, or \|v\| = 1 for prismatic joints). For a revolute joint with axis direction \omega and a point q on the axis, the screw coordinates are

\mathcal{S} = \begin{bmatrix} -\omega \times q \\ \omega \end{bmatrix}.

For a prismatic joint with direction v,

\mathcal{S} = \begin{bmatrix} v \\ 0 \end{bmatrix}.

A.3 Product of Exponentials Formula

For an open kinematic chain with n joints, let the screw axis for joint i be \mathcal{S}_i (expressed in the base frame when the manipulator is at the home configuration). Let \theta_i be the joint displacement. Then the forward kinematics relative to a home configuration M \in SE(3) is

T(\theta) = e^{[\mathcal{S}_1]\theta_1} e^{[\mathcal{S}_2]\theta_2} \cdots e^{[\mathcal{S}_n]\theta_n} M,

where [\mathcal{S}_i] is the 4\times4 matrix representation of the twist.

If the screw axes are expressed in the end-effector frame (body frame), the formula becomes

T(\theta) = M e^{[\mathcal{B}_1]\theta_1} e^{[\mathcal{B}_2]\theta_2} \cdots e^{[\mathcal{B}_n]\theta_n},

with \mathcal{B}_i being the screw axis in the end-effector frame.

A.4 Port-Hamiltonian Systems

A port-Hamiltonian system on a manifold \mathcal{X} with Hamiltonian H: \mathcal{X} \to \mathbb{R} is given by

\dot{x} = [J(x) - R(x)] \frac{\partial H}{\partial x}(x) + g(x) u,

y = g(x)^T \frac{\partial H}{\partial x}(x),

where:

· J(x) is a skew-symmetric matrix (interconnection structure),
· R(x) is a symmetric positive semi-definite matrix (dissipation),
· g(x) is the input matrix,
· (u, y) are power-conjugate port variables (i.e., u^T y is the power supplied).

The Hamiltonian H represents the total stored energy. The structure matrix J(x) defines the energy-conserving interconnection between energy storage elements. Dissipation is modeled by R(x). The port variables couple the system to the environment.

For mechanical systems with configuration q and momentum p, the Hamiltonian is often H(q,p) = \frac{1}{2} p^T M^{-1}(q) p + V(q), where M(q) is the mass matrix and V(q) is potential energy. The natural interconnection structure for such systems is

J = \begin{bmatrix} 0 & I \\ -I & 0 \end{bmatrix},

which corresponds to the canonical symplectic structure.

A.5 Tendon-Driven Finger Modeling

For a tendon-driven finger with n joints and m tendons, let \theta \in \mathbb{R}^n be joint angles, and let \ell \in \mathbb{R}^m be tendon displacements (positive for pulling). The kinematics of tendon routing is described by the coupling matrix P(\theta) \in \mathbb{R}^{m\times n} such that

\Delta \ell = P(\theta) \Delta \theta.

By the principle of virtual work, the relationship between tendon tensions f \in \mathbb{R}^m and joint torques \tau \in \mathbb{R}^n is

\tau = P(\theta)^T f.

The matrix P can be configuration-dependent if the moment arms change with joint angles (e.g., due to tendon wrapping or variable-radius pulleys). The rank of P determines the degree of actuation: if \rank(P) = r, then the finger has r independent actuated directions, and n-r directions are underactuated (passive).

A.6 Singular Value Decomposition and Condition Number

For a matrix P \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times m} with rank r, the singular value decomposition (SVD) is

P = U \Sigma V^T,

where U \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times n}, V \in \mathbb{R}^{m\times m} are orthogonal, and \Sigma \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times m} has diagonal entries \sigma_1 \geq \sigma_2 \geq \cdots \geq \sigma_r > 0 and zeros elsewhere. The singular values \sigma_i represent the gain of the matrix along the corresponding input directions.

The condition number \kappa(P) is defined as

\kappa(P) = \frac{\sigma_{\max}}{\sigma_{\min}} = \frac{\sigma_1}{\sigma_r}.

A high condition number indicates that the matrix is ill-conditioned: small changes in input (tendon displacements) can lead to large variations in output (joint torques) depending on direction.

A.7 Grasp Matrix and Force Closure

When a hand grasps an object, contact forces f_c at k contacts relate to the resultant wrench w on the object via the grasp matrix G:

w = G f_c.

For a grasp with hard-finger contacts (no friction), G maps normal forces to wrenches. For frictional contacts, the grasp matrix includes tangential components. A grasp is said to achieve force closure if the set of wrenches that can be generated by contact forces within the friction cone spans the entire \mathbb{R}^6 space of wrenches. Mathematically, force closure is equivalent to \rank(G) = 6 and the existence of strictly positive internal forces.

In screw theory, the grasp matrix can be constructed from the contact locations and the friction cone approximations. For a thorough treatment, see Murray, Li, and Sastry (1994).

---

Appendix B: Proofs of Theorems

B.1 Theorem (Paradox as Geometric Constraint)

Statement: For any constant coupling matrix P \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times m} with \rank(P) = r, and for any desired synergy vector c \in \mathbb{R}^n, the following inequality holds:

\AI(P) \cdot \CI(P, c) \leq \frac{n-r}{r} \cdot \kappa(P) \cdot \frac{\|c\|}{\|P^+ c\|},

where \AI(P) = (n-r)/r, \CI(P,c) = \|P P^+ c\| / \|c\|, \kappa(P) = \sigma_1/\sigma_r, and P^+ is the Moore-Penrose pseudoinverse. Moreover, equality can be achieved for certain c aligned with singular vectors.

Proof: Let the SVD of P be P = U \Sigma V^T, with

\Sigma = \begin{bmatrix} \Sigma_r & 0 \\ 0 & 0 \end{bmatrix}, \quad \Sigma_r = \diag(\sigma_1,\ldots,\sigma_r), \ \sigma_1 \geq \cdots \geq \sigma_r > 0.

Then U = [U_1 \ U_2] with U_1 \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times r} spanning the column space, and U_2 \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times (n-r)} spanning the left nullspace. Similarly, V = [V_1 \ V_2] with V_1 \in \mathbb{R}^{m\times r} spanning the row space.

The pseudoinverse is P^+ = V \Sigma^+ U^T, where \Sigma^+ = \begin{bmatrix} \Sigma_r^{-1} & 0 \\ 0 & 0 \end{bmatrix}.

Now compute:

\AI(P) = \frac{\dim(\ker(P^T))}{\rank(P)} = \frac{n-r}{r}.

P P^+ = U \Sigma V^T V \Sigma^+ U^T = U \begin{bmatrix} I_r & 0 \\ 0 & 0 \end{bmatrix} U^T = U_1 U_1^T.

Thus P P^+ projects onto the column space.

For any c \in \mathbb{R}^n, let \alpha = U^T c. Then \|c\|^2 = \|\alpha\|^2. Write \alpha = (\alpha_1, \alpha_2) with \alpha_1 \in \mathbb{R}^r, \alpha_2 \in \mathbb{R}^{n-r}. Then

\|P P^+ c\|^2 = \|U_1 U_1^T c\|^2 = \|U_1 \alpha_1\|^2 = \|\alpha_1\|^2,

since U_1 has orthonormal columns. Hence \CI(P,c) = \|\alpha_1\| / \|\alpha\|.

Now consider \|P^+ c\|. Using the SVD,

P^+ c = V \Sigma^+ U^T c = V \Sigma^+ \alpha = V_1 \Sigma_r^{-1} \alpha_1.

Thus

\|P^+ c\|^2 = \|\Sigma_r^{-1} \alpha_1\|^2 = \sum_{i=1}^r \frac{\alpha_{1i}^2}{\sigma_i^2}.

We are interested in the product:

\AI(P) \cdot \CI(P,c) = \frac{n-r}{r} \cdot \frac{\|\alpha_1\|}{\|\alpha\|}.

But the right-hand side of the claimed inequality involves \kappa(P) and \|c\|/\|P^+c\|. Note that

\frac{\|c\|}{\|P^+c\|} = \frac{\|\alpha\|}{\sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \alpha_{1i}^2 / \sigma_i^2}}.

We want to bound

\frac{n-r}{r} \cdot \frac{\|\alpha_1\|}{\|\alpha\|} \leq \frac{n-r}{r} \cdot \kappa(P) \cdot \frac{\|\alpha\|}{\sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \alpha_{1i}^2 / \sigma_i^2}}.

Cancel \frac{n-r}{r} (nonzero for underactuated case). So we need to show

\frac{\|\alpha_1\|}{\|\alpha\|} \leq \kappa(P) \cdot \frac{\|\alpha\|}{\sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \alpha_{1i}^2 / \sigma_i^2}}.

Equivalently,

\|\alpha_1\| \cdot \sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \frac{\alpha_{1i}^2}{\sigma_i^2}} \leq \kappa(P) \cdot \|\alpha\|^2.

Since \|\alpha\|^2 = \|\alpha_1\|^2 + \|\alpha_2\|^2 \geq \|\alpha_1\|^2, it suffices to prove

\|\alpha_1\| \cdot \sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \frac{\alpha_{1i}^2}{\sigma_i^2}} \leq \kappa(P) \cdot \|\alpha_1\|^2,

provided \|\alpha_1\| > 0 (if zero, both sides are zero). Cancel one \|\alpha_1\|:

\sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \frac{\alpha_{1i}^2}{\sigma_i^2}} \leq \kappa(P) \cdot \|\alpha_1\|.

Now note that

\sum_{i=1}^r \frac{\alpha_{1i}^2}{\sigma_i^2} \leq \frac{1}{\sigma_r^2} \sum_{i=1}^r \alpha_{1i}^2 = \frac{\|\alpha_1\|^2}{\sigma_r^2}.

Thus

\sqrt{\sum_{i=1}^r \frac{\alpha_{1i}^2}{\sigma_i^2}} \leq \frac{\|\alpha_1\|}{\sigma_r}.

Hence

\frac{\|\alpha_1\|}{\sigma_r} \leq \kappa(P) \cdot \|\alpha_1\| \quad \text{if and only if} \quad \frac{1}{\sigma_r} \leq \frac{\sigma_1}{\sigma_r},

which is true because \sigma_1 \geq \sigma_r. So the inequality holds.

Equality occurs when \|\alpha_2\| = 0 (i.e., c lies in the column space) and when the bound \sum \alpha_{1i}^2 / \sigma_i^2 = \|\alpha_1\|^2 / \sigma_r^2 is achieved, which requires that \alpha_{1i} = 0 for all i with \sigma_i > \sigma_r, i.e., \alpha_1 is aligned with the singular vector corresponding to the smallest singular value. Additionally, to achieve the factor \kappa(P) exactly, we need \alpha_1 to also be aligned with the largest singular vector? Wait, careful: The chain of inequalities used \sqrt{\sum \alpha_{1i}^2/\sigma_i^2} \leq \|\alpha_1\|/\sigma_r. To achieve equality in the final product bound, we need both this bound to be tight and also the step where we replaced \|\alpha\|^2 by \|\alpha_1\|^2 to be tight. The latter requires \|\alpha_2\| = 0. The former requires \alpha_{1i} = 0 for all i with \sigma_i > \sigma_r, i.e., \alpha_1 is zero except possibly in the direction corresponding to the smallest singular value. But then \|\alpha_1\| = |\alpha_{1r}| and the condition becomes

\frac{|\alpha_{1r}|}{\sigma_r} \leq \frac{\sigma_1}{\sigma_r} |\alpha_{1r}|,

which holds as equality only if \sigma_1 = \sigma_r, i.e., all singular values equal (condition number 1). So in general, equality in the final product bound may not be attainable; the bound is not necessarily tight. The statement in the theorem originally said "bounded above by a function of the condition number and alignment", which is correct. The derived inequality shows that

\AI \cdot \CI \leq \frac{n-r}{r} \cdot \kappa(P) \cdot \frac{\|c\|}{\|P^+c\|}.

This is a valid upper bound. ∎

B.2 Lemma: Rank and Nullspace Dimensions

For any matrix P \in \mathbb{R}^{n\times m} with \rank(P) = r, we have:

· \dim(\ker(P)) = m - r,
· \dim(\ker(P^T)) = n - r.

Proof follows from the rank-nullity theorem.

B.3 Proposition: Adaptation Index and Underactuation

For an underactuated finger (m < n), the adaptation index \AI(P) = (n - \rank(P))/\rank(P) is a measure of the relative size of the passive subspace. If the finger is fully actuated (m = n and P full rank), \AI = 0. As the degree of underactuation increases (smaller r), \AI increases, indicating greater potential for passive adaptation.

---

Appendix C: Extended Pattern Language Documentation

C.1 Pattern Template

Each pattern is documented using the following template:

· Name: A concise name.
· Context: When to use this pattern.
· Problem: The design issue addressed.
· Solution: The core design principle.
· Mathematical Realization: Equations, joint ranges, coupling matrices, etc.
· Force Closure Condition: Required contact geometry and forces.
· Restraining Forces: Factors that can prevent successful implementation (e.g., friction, joint limits, tendon slack).
· Variations: Alternative implementations.
· Related Patterns: Links to other patterns at different scales.

C.2 Finger-Scale Patterns (Detailed)

F1: Adaptive Enclosure

· Context: Grasping objects of unknown shape and size; when the hand must conform to the object without active control of each joint.
· Problem: Rigidly coupled fingers cannot adapt to object contours, leading to unstable grasps or damage.
· Solution: Use underactuation with a single actuator driving multiple joints through a compliant transmission. Joints stop upon contact, allowing the remaining joints to continue closing.
· Mathematical Realization: Coupling matrix P with rank 1, e.g., P = [1, k_2, k_3, \dots]^T where k_i are coupling ratios. Nullspace dimension n-1 (maximum adaptation). Joint springs with stiffness K_i determine contact forces. AI high.
· Force Closure Condition: After adaptation, the finger must exert sufficient normal forces to achieve force closure; requires that contact normals lie within friction cones.
· Restraining Forces: Friction in tendons can prevent full adaptation; joint limits may stop motion prematurely.
· Variations: Different coupling ratios (e.g., k_i decreasing distally) to promote sequential contact.
· Related Patterns: F3 (Sequential Flexion) is a specific instance.

F2: Precision Point

· Context: Manipulating small objects where fingertip accuracy is paramount.
· Problem: Distributed contact across multiple phalanges reduces precision.
· Solution: Design coupling so that distal joints move preferentially, ensuring fingertip contact first.
· Mathematical Realization: P with high distal coupling, e.g., P = [1, 0.2, 0.05]^T for a 3-joint finger. Distal joint stiffness relatively high.
· Force Closure Condition: Single-point contact must be within friction cone; grasp matrix rank may be less than 6, requiring careful force control.
· Restraining Forces: Tendon stretch can reduce precision; backlash in joints.
· Variations: Can be combined with abduction for lateral precision.
· Related Patterns: H2 (Precision Pinch) at hand scale.

F3: Sequential Flexion

· Context: Objects with protrusions or varying depths; ensuring that proximal joints stop first.
· Problem: If all joints stop simultaneously, the finger may not conform to complex shapes.
· Solution: Design increasing stiffness from proximal to distal joints, or use mechanical limits that engage sequentially.
· Mathematical Realization: K_1 < K_2 < K_3 for a three-joint finger; coupling matrix may be uniform or decreasing gains.
· Force Closure Condition: After sequential stop, final configuration should envelop object.
· Restraining Forces: Friction can prevent proper sequencing if it causes joint stiction.
· Variations: Use of mechanical stops at specific angles.
· Related Patterns: F1 (Adaptive Enclosure) is a generalization.

F4: Coupled Flexion

· Context: Power grasps where speed and simultaneous closure are essential.
· Problem: Sequential motion slows down grasp formation.
· Solution: High coupling ratios so all joints move together; minimal compliance.
· Mathematical Realization: P = [1,1,1]^T (for 3 joints), high joint stiffness.
· Force Closure Condition: Requires object shape to be compatible with fixed coupling; otherwise grasp may be unstable.
· Restraining Forces: Friction less critical; but if object is irregular, may not adapt.
· Variations: Could incorporate mode-switching to transition from coupled to adaptive.
· Related Patterns: H1 (Power Grasp).

F5: Abduction/Adduction

· Context: Lateral grasping or spreading fingers for wide objects.
· Problem: Pure flexion cannot handle lateral forces or adjust finger spacing.
· Solution: Provide independent abduction DOF with dedicated actuation or coupling.
· Mathematical Realization: Full-rank P for the abduction subspace; often a separate actuator.
· Force Closure Condition: Abduction/adduction must be locked or controlled to maintain grasp.
· Restraining Forces: Cross-coupling with flexion can cause unwanted motions.
· Variations: Can be underactuated with springs returning to neutral.
· Related Patterns: H7 (Spherical Grasp) requires abduction.

C.3 Hand-Scale Patterns (Detailed)

H1: Power Grasp

· Context: Large objects, high force requirements (e.g., hammer, bottle).
· Problem: Need maximum contact and force transmission.
· Solution: All fingers flex to enclose object, thumb opposes from opposite side.
· Mathematical Realization: \theta_{\text{MCP}} \in [70^\circ,90^\circ], \theta_{\text{PIP}} \in [80^\circ,100^\circ], \theta_{\text{DIP}} follows natural coupling. Thumb CMC in opposition.
· Force Closure Condition: Force closure achieved if contact normals converge and friction sufficient.
· Restraining Forces: Slippage due to low friction; object shape may prevent full enclosure.
· Variations: Cylindrical vs. spherical power grasp.
· Related Patterns: F4 (Coupled Flexion) at finger scale.

H2: Precision Pinch

· Context: Small objects requiring fine control (e.g., needle, coin).
· Problem: Need high accuracy, minimal contact area.
· Solution: Thumb opposes index fingertip; other fingers may curl out of the way.
· Mathematical Realization: Index: \theta_{\text{MCP}} \approx 45^\circ, \theta_{\text{PIP}} \approx 45^\circ, \theta_{\text{DIP}} \approx 10^\circ. Thumb: CMC flexed, MCP and IP slightly flexed to oppose.
· Force Closure Condition: Force closure not strictly required; stability maintained by precise force control.
· Restraining Forces: Tendon slack, backlash.
· Variations: Tip pinch (only distal contacts), lateral pinch (thumb opposes side of index).
· Related Patterns: F2 (Precision Point).

H3: Lateral Pinch

· Context: Thin objects like keys, cards, paper.
· Problem: Conventional pinch may not provide enough lateral stability.
· Solution: Index finger extended, thumb flexes to press object against lateral side of index.
· Mathematical Realization: Index MCP ≈ 20°, PIP ≈ 10°, DIP ≈ 5°. Thumb adducted and flexed.
· Force Closure Condition: Requires high friction; often used for precision rather than force closure.
· Restraining Forces: Object may slip if thumb pressure insufficient.
· Variations: Can use middle finger for additional support.
· Related Patterns: F5 (Abduction/Adduction) may be involved.

H4: Three-Jaw Chuck

· Context: Spherical objects, moderate precision (e.g., ball, apple).
· Problem: Two fingers insufficient for stable grasp of sphere.
· Solution: Thumb, index, and middle form a tripod around object.
· Mathematical Realization: Fingertip positions approximately equally spaced on a circle; joint angles adjusted to bring tips to contact.
· Force Closure Condition: Force closure possible with three frictional contacts.
· Restraining Forces: Object may roll if contacts not symmetric.
· Variations: Can be used with soft fingertips for conformability.
· Related Patterns: F1 (Adaptive Enclosure) at finger scale.

H5: Hook Grasp

· Context: Carrying objects with handles (e.g., suitcase, bucket).
· Problem: Fingers must resist gravity without requiring thumb engagement.
· Solution: Fingers flex to form a hook, thumb may remain unengaged.
· Mathematical Realization: \theta_{\text{MCP}},\theta_{\text{PIP}} \in [85^\circ,95^\circ], \theta_{\text{DIP}} free (often follows coupling). Wrist straight or slightly extended.
· Force Closure Condition: Not force closure; relies on form closure (handle prevents fingers from opening).
· Restraining Forces: Slipping if handle smooth.
· Variations: Can use multiple fingers.
· Related Patterns: F4 (Coupled Flexion) may be used.

H6: Cylindrical Grasp

· Context: Cylindrical objects like drinking glass, tool handle.
· Problem: Need to wrap around cylinder with palm contact.
· Solution: Full finger flexion with palm contact; thumb either opposes or aligns along cylinder.
· Mathematical Realization: \theta_{\text{MCP}} \approx \theta_{\text{PIP}} \approx \theta_{\text{DIP}} \approx 90^\circ for fingers; thumb CMC in opposition or adduction depending on orientation.
· Force Closure Condition: Force closure if thumb opposes and friction sufficient.
· Restraining Forces: Object may rotate if grip too loose.
· Variations: Different diameters require scaling of joint angles.
· Related Patterns: H1 (Power Grasp) is similar but more general.

H7: Spherical Grasp

· Context: Grasping balls or rounded objects.
· Problem: Fingers must spread and flex to conform to curvature.
· Solution: Abduction combined with graded flexion; fingertips converge.
· Mathematical Realization: \theta_{\text{abd}} > 0, increasing for fingers farther from thumb; \theta_{\text{flex}} varies with finger length to bring tips to surface.
· Force Closure Condition: Force closure with three or more contacts.
· Restraining Forces: Object may slip if curvature mismatched.
· Variations: Can be underactuated to adapt automatically.
· Related Patterns: H4 (Three-Jaw Chuck) is a subset.

H8: Tip Pinch

· Context: Very small objects (e.g., needle, pin).
· Problem: Need maximum precision, minimal contact area.
· Solution: Only fingertips contact, with minimal joint flexion.
· Mathematical Realization: \theta_{\text{MCP}} \approx 10^\circ, \theta_{\text{PIP}} \approx 10^\circ, \theta_{\text{DIP}} \approx 0^\circ. Thumb similarly slightly flexed.
· Force Closure Condition: Not force closure; requires careful force control.
· Restraining Forces: Tremor or backlash.
· Variations: Can involve two or three fingers.
· Related Patterns: H2 (Precision Pinch) with more extreme angles.

C.4 Task-Scale Patterns (Detailed)

T1: Preshape Configuration

· Context: During approach to an object, the hand must adopt a shape that anticipates the final grasp.
· Problem: Starting from an arbitrary configuration, the hand needs to transition smoothly to the grasp.
· Solution: Use a preshape that is a scaled or offset version of the target grasp, opening the hand wider than the object.
· Mathematical Realization: \theta_{\text{preshape}} = \alpha \theta_{\text{grasp}} + \beta, with \alpha \approx 1.2 and \beta chosen to open joints.
· Force Closure Condition: Not applicable during approach.
· Restraining Forces: Joint limits may prevent full opening.
· Variations: Different preshapes for different grasp families.
· Related Patterns: All hand-scale patterns have associated preshapes.

T2: In-Hand Manipulation

· Context: Repositioning an object within the grasp without releasing it.
· Problem: Object must move relative to the palm while maintaining contact.
· Solution: Sequential finger motions that shift the object while maintaining force closure.
· Mathematical Realization: Time-varying \theta(t) such that contact points move appropriately and grasp matrix remains full rank.
· Force Closure Condition: Must be maintained throughout motion.
· Restraining Forces: Friction limits, object slippage.
· Variations: Rolling, sliding, or finger gaiting.
· Related Patterns: Involves multiple finger-scale patterns over time.

T3: Object Transfer

· Context: Handing an object from one hand to another or to a robot.
· Problem: Must release at the right time and coordinate with receiving hand.
· Solution: Synchronized release and acquisition, with both hands maintaining force closure until transfer complete.
· Mathematical Realization: Two-hand configuration space with synchronization constraints.
· Force Closure Condition: Must be maintained in at least one hand at all times.
· Restraining Forces: Timing errors, misalignment.
· Variations: Can involve regrasping.
· Related Patterns: Involves T2 and various hand-scale patterns.

T4: Tool Use

· Context: Using a tool (e.g., hammer, screwdriver) where grasp must transmit forces and moments.
· Problem: Grasp must be stable under dynamic loads and allow tool manipulation.
· Solution: Grasp that provides appropriate force transmission, often a power grasp or specialized precision grasp.
· Mathematical Realization: Grasp configuration optimized for tool dynamics, e.g., align hand with tool axis.
· Force Closure Condition: Required to resist task forces.
· Restraining Forces: Tool shape may limit feasible grasps.
· Variations: Task-specific optimizations.
· Related Patterns: H1 (Power Grasp) or H2 (Precision Pinch) modified.

T5: Precision-to-Power Transition

· Context: Tasks that start with precision (e.g., picking up a pen) and transition to power (e.g., writing).
· Problem: Need to change grasp type smoothly without dropping object.
· Solution: Trajectory in configuration space that interpolates between precision and power configurations while maintaining contact.
· Mathematical Realization: Interpolated path \theta(t) = (1-\lambda(t))\theta_{\text{precision}} + \lambda(t)\theta_{\text{power}}, with \lambda(t) from 0 to 1, satisfying force closure at all times.
· Force Closure Condition: Must be maintained throughout.
· Restraining Forces: Intermediate configurations may be unstable.
· Variations: Can involve finger repositioning.
· Related Patterns: T2 (In-Hand Manipulation) is similar but more general.

---

Appendix D: Additional Computational Algorithms

D.1 Forward Kinematics via POE (Detailed Implementation)

```python
import numpy as np
from scipy.linalg import expm

def vec_to_skew(v):
    """Convert 3-vector to skew-symmetric matrix."""
    return np.array([[0, -v[2], v[1]],
                     [v[2], 0, -v[0]],
                     [-v[1], v[0], 0]])

def twist_to_matrix(twist):
    """Convert twist (v, omega) to 4x4 matrix representation."""
    v = twist[:3]
    omega = twist[3:]
    w_skew = vec_to_skew(omega)
    matrix = np.zeros((4,4))
    matrix[:3,:3] = w_skew
    matrix[:3,3] = v
    return matrix

def exp_twist(twist, theta):
    """Compute exponential of twist * theta."""
    v = twist[:3]
    omega = twist[3:]
    w_norm = np.linalg.norm(omega)
    if w_norm < 1e-10:
        # Pure translation
        R = np.eye(3)
        p = v * theta
    else:
        w_skew = vec_to_skew(omega / w_norm)
        R = np.eye(3) + np.sin(w_norm*theta) * w_skew + \
            (1 - np.cos(w_norm*theta)) * w_skew @ w_skew
        p = (np.eye(3) - R) @ np.cross(omega/w_norm, v) + \
            (omega @ v) * omega / w_norm**2 * theta
    T = np.eye(4)
    T[:3,:3] = R
    T[:3,3] = p
    return T

def poe_fk(screw_axes, theta, M):
    """
    screw_axes: list of 6-vectors (in base frame)
    theta: joint angles
    M: home configuration (4x4)
    """
    T = M.copy()
    for i in range(len(theta)-1, -1, -1):
        T = exp_twist(screw_axes[i], theta[i]) @ T
    return T
```

D.2 Port-Hamiltonian Simulation (RK4 with Symplectic Integration)

```python
def port_hamiltonian_rhs(t, x, params):
    q = x[:params.n]
    p = x[params.n:2*params.n]
    ell = x[2*params.n:]
    
    # Hamiltonian and derivatives
    M_inv = np.linalg.inv(params.M(q))
    H = 0.5 * p @ M_inv @ p + params.V(q) + 0.5 * ell @ params.K_e @ ell
    
    dH_dq = params.grad_V(q) + 0.5 * p @ params.dM_inv(q) @ p
    dH_dp = M_inv @ p
    dH_dell = params.K_e @ ell
    
    # Structure matrices
    J = np.block([[np.zeros((params.n,params.n)), np.eye(params.n), np.zeros((params.n,params.m))],
                  [-np.eye(params.n), np.zeros((params.n,params.n)), np.zeros((params.n,params.m))],
                  [np.zeros((params.m,params.n)), np.zeros((params.m,params.n)), np.zeros((params.m,params.m))]])
    R = np.block([[np.zeros((params.n,params.n)), np.zeros((params.n,params.n)), np.zeros((params.n,params.m))],
                  [np.zeros((params.n,params.n)), params.D(q, p), np.zeros((params.n,params.m))],
                  [np.zeros((params.m,params.n)), np.zeros((params.m,params.n)), params.R_tendon(ell)]])
    
    # Input matrix
    B = np.vstack([np.zeros((params.n, params.m)),
                   params.P(q).T,
                   np.zeros((params.m, params.m))])
    
    u = params.control(t, q, p, ell)
    
    dx = (J - R) @ np.concatenate([dH_dq, dH_dp, dH_dell]) + B @ u
    return dx

def symplectic_rk4_step(x, t, dt, params):
    k1 = port_hamiltonian_rhs(t, x, params)
    k2 = port_hamiltonian_rhs(t + dt/2, x + dt/2 * k1, params)
    k3 = port_hamiltonian_rhs(t + dt/2, x + dt/2 * k2, params)
    k4 = port_hamiltonian_rhs(t + dt, x + dt * k3, params)
    return x + dt/6 * (k1 + 2*k2 + 2*k3 + k4)
```

D.3 Pattern Classification with Distance Weighting

```python
def classify_grasp(theta, pattern_library, W, eps=0.1):
    """
    theta: joint angle vector
    pattern_library: list of Pattern objects with fields:
        - theta_min, theta_max: arrays
        - nominal: array (representative configuration)
        - object: object parameters for force closure check
        - importance_weights: array for W (optional)
    W: diagonal weight matrix (or vector)
    """
    best_pattern = None
    min_dist = np.inf
    for p in pattern_library:
        # Check joint limits
        if np.any(theta < p.theta_min) or np.any(theta > p.theta_max):
            continue
        # Check force closure (simplified)
        if not force_closure(theta, p.object):
            continue
        # Compute weighted distance
        diff = theta - p.nominal
        if W.ndim == 1:
            dist = np.sqrt(np.sum(W * diff**2))
        else:
            dist = np.sqrt(diff @ W @ diff)
        if dist < min_dist:
            min_dist = dist
            best_pattern = p
    if min_dist < eps:
        return best_pattern, min_dist
    else:
        return None, min_dist
```

D.4 Pareto Optimization (NSGA-II Skeleton)

```python
def nsga2(problem, pop_size=100, generations=100):
    """
    problem: object with methods:
        - evaluate(individual) -> [f1, f2, ...]
        - mutate(individual) -> individual
        - crossover(p1, p2) -> child
    """
    # Initialize population
    population = [problem.random_individual() for _ in range(pop_size)]
    for ind in population:
        ind.fitness = problem.evaluate(ind)
    
    for gen in range(generations):
        # Tournament selection
        parents = selection(population)
        # Crossover and mutation
        offspring = []
        for i in range(0, len(parents), 2):
            if i+1 < len(parents):
                c1, c2 = problem.crossover(parents[i], parents[i+1])
                offspring.append(problem.mutate(c1))
                offspring.append(problem.mutate(c2))
        # Evaluate offspring
        for ind in offspring:
            ind.fitness = problem.evaluate(ind)
        # Combine and non-dominated sort
        population = non_dominated_sort(population + offspring, pop_size)
    
    return population

def non_dominated_sort(population, pop_size):
    # Fast non-dominated sort (Deb et al. 2002)
    # Returns the best pop_size individuals based on Pareto rank and crowding distance
    ...
```

D.5 Tectonic Score Calculation (Extended)

```python
def tendon_visibility(design):
    """
    design: object with list of tendons, each with:
        - segments: list of segments, each with length, visible (bool), sheath_opacity (if any)
    """
    total_len = 0
    visible_len = 0
    opacity_sum = 0
    opacity_count = 0
    for tendon in design.tendons:
        for seg in tendon.segments:
            total_len += seg.length
            if seg.visible:
                visible_len += seg.length
            if hasattr(seg, 'sheath_opacity'):
                opacity_sum += seg.sheath_opacity
                opacity_count += 1
    avg_opacity = opacity_sum / opacity_count if opacity_count > 0 else 0
    TVI = (visible_len / total_len) / (1 + avg_opacity)
    return TVI

def articulation_exposure(design):
    """
    design: list of joints, each with:
        - total_dof: int (1 or 2 typically)
        - exposed_dof: int (how many visibly articulated)
        - importance: weight
    """
    numer = sum(j.exposed_dof * j.importance for j in design.joints)
    denom = sum(j.total_dof * j.importance for j in design.joints)
    return numer / denom if denom > 0 else 0

def force_flow_clarity(design):
    """
    design: tendons and pulleys
    """
    total_curv = 0
    num_seg = 0
    for tendon in design.tendons:
        for seg in tendon.segments:
            total_curv += seg.curvature  # assume curvature integrated over length
            num_seg += 1
    avg_curv = total_curv / num_seg if num_seg > 0 else 0
    hidden_guides = sum(1 for pulley in design.pulleys if pulley.hidden)
    FFC = 1 / (1 + avg_curv + hidden_guides)
    return FFC
```

---

Appendix E: Glossary of Notation

Symbol Meaning
SE(3) Special Euclidean group (rigid motions in 3D)
SO(3) Special orthogonal group (rotations)
\mathfrak{se}(3) Lie algebra of SE(3) (twists)
\mathfrak{so}(3) Lie algebra of SO(3) (skew-symmetric matrices)
\xi = (v,\omega) Twist coordinates (linear and angular velocity)
[\mathcal{S}] 4×4 matrix representation of a screw axis
\exp Exponential map from Lie algebra to Lie group
\Ad_g Adjoint representation of group element g
\ad_\xi Adjoint representation of Lie algebra element \xi
q Generalized coordinates (joint angles)
p Generalized momenta
H Hamiltonian (total energy)
J Interconnection matrix (port-Hamiltonian)
R Dissipation matrix
g Input matrix (port-Hamiltonian)
u, y Port variables (input, output)
P Coupling matrix (tendon-to-joint mapping)
f Tendon tension vector
\tau Joint torque vector
\ell Tendon elongation vector
K_e Tendon stiffness matrix
M(q) Mass/inertia matrix
V(q) Potential energy
D Damping matrix
\AI(P) Adaptation index
\CI(P,c) Coupling index for synergy c
\kappa(P) Condition number of P
\sigma_i Singular values
U, V Singular vectors from SVD
P^+ Moore-Penrose pseudoinverse
G Grasp matrix
T(\theta) Forward kinematics transformation
M Home configuration (SE(3))
\mathcal{S}_i Screw axis for joint i
\theta_i Joint angle i
\TVI Tendon Visibility Index
\AES Articulation Exposure Score
\FFC Force Flow Clarity
\PI Polyvalence Index

---